src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/geminerede-stammer-lukkelyde_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Nomener som får g -> kk, miniparadigme:
    aalisagaq+N+Abs+Sg: aalisagaq
    aalisagaq+N+Rel+Sg: aalisakkap
    aalisagaq+N+Abl+Sg: [aalisakkamit, aalisakkamiit, aalisakkaminngaanniit]
    aalisagaq+N+Aeq+Sg: aalisakkatut
    aalisagaq+N+Ins+Sg: aalisakkamik
    aalisagaq+N+Trm+Sg: aalisakkamut
    aalisagaq+N+Lok+Sg: aalisakkami
    aalisagaq+N+Abs+Pl: aalisakkat
    aalisagaq+N+Rel+Pl: aalisakkat
    aalisagaq+N+Abl+Pl: [aalisakkanit, aalisakkaniit, aalisakkaninngaanniit]
    aalisagaq+N+Aeq+Pl: aalisakkatut
    aalisagaq+N+Ins+Pl: aalisakkanik
    aalisagaq+N+Trm+Pl: aalisakkanut
    aalisagaq+N+Lok+Pl: aalisakkani


  Nomener som får g -> kk, possessiver:
    aalisagaq+N+Abs+Sg+3PlPoss: aalisagaat
    aalisagaq+N+Abs+Pl+3PlPoss: aalisagaat
    aalisagaq+N+Abs+Sg+3SgPoss: aalisagaa
    aalisagaq+N+Abs+Pl+3SgPoss: aalisagai
    aalisagaq+N+Rel+Sg+3SgPoss: aalisagaata
    aalisagaq+N+Rel+Pl+3SgPoss: aalisagaasa
    aalisagaq+N+Rel+Sg+3PlPoss: aalisagaata
    aalisagaq+N+Rel+Pl+3PlPoss: aalisagaasa


  Nomener som får m -> mm, miniparadigme:
    ameq+Gram/GEM+N+Abs+Sg: ameq
    ameq+N+Abs+Sg: ameq
    ameq+Gram/GEM+N+Rel+Sg: ammip
    ameq+Gram/GEM+N+Abl+Sg: [ammimit, ammiminngaanniit, ammimiit]
    ameq+Gram/GEM+N+Aeq+Sg: ammitut
    ameq+Gram/GEM+N+Ins+Sg: ammimik
    ameq+Gram/GEM+N+Trm+Sg: ammimut
    ameq+Gram/GEM+N+Lok+Sg: ammimi
    ameq+Gram/GEM+N+Via+Sg: ammikkut
    ameq+Gram/GEM+N+Abs+Pl: ammit
    ameq+Gram/GEM+N+Rel+Pl: ammit
    ameq+Gram/GEM+N+Abl+Pl: [amminit, amminiit, ammininngaanniit]
    ameq+Gram/GEM+N+Aeq+Pl: ammitut
    ameq+Gram/GEM+N+Ins+Pl: amminik
    ameq+Gram/GEM+N+Trm+Pl: amminut
    ameq+Gram/GEM+N+Lok+Pl: ammini
    ameq+Gram/GEM+N+Via+Pl: ammitigut

    ameq+Gram/str+N+Rel+Sg: amiup
    ameq+Gram/Sh+N+Abl+Sg: amermit
    ameq+Gram/Lo+N+Abl+Sg: amermiit
# følgende udkommenteret, da de laver bøvl med testen:
#    ameq+N+Aeq+Sg: amertut
#    ameq+N+Ins+Sg: amermik
#    ameq+N+Trm+Sg: amermut
#    ameq+N+Lok+Sg: amermi
#    ameq+N+Via+Sg: amikkut
#    ameq+N+Abs+Pl: amiit
#    ameq+N+Rel+Pl: amiit
#    ameq+N+Abl+Pl: [amerninngaanniit, amernit, ammininngaanniit, amminiit, amerniit]
#    ameq+N+Aeq+Pl: amertut
#    ameq+N+Ins+Pl: amernik
#    ameq+N+Trm+Pl: amernut
#    ameq+N+Lok+Pl: amerni
#    ameq+N+Via+Pl: amertigut


  Nomener som får m -> mm, possessiver:
    ameq+N+Abs+Sg+1PlPoss: amerput
    ameq+N+Abs+Sg+2PlPoss: amersi
    ameq+N+Abs+Sg+4PlPoss: amertik
    ameq+N+Abs+Sg+1SgPoss: amera
    ameq+N+Rel+Sg+3SgPoss: amiata
    ameq+N+Rel+Pl+3SgPoss: amiisa
    ameq+Gram/GEM+N+Abs+Sg+3PlPoss: amiat
    ameq+N+Rel+Sg+3PlPoss: amiata
    ameq+N+Rel+Pl+3PlPoss: amiisa
    ameq+N+Abs+Sg+3SgPoss: amia
    ameq+N+Abs+Pl+3SgPoss: amii
    ameq+Gram/GEM+N+Rel+Sg+1SgPoss: ammima
    ameq+Gram/GEM+N+Rel+Pl+1SgPoss: ammima
    ameq+Gram/GEM+N+Rel+Sg+2SgPoss: ammivit
    ameq+Gram/GEM+N+Rel+Pl+2SgPoss: ammivit
    ameq+Gram/GEM+N+Rel+Sg+4SgPoss: ammimi
    ameq+Gram/GEM+N+Rel+Pl+4SgPoss: ammimi
    ameq+Gram/GEM+N+Rel+Sg+1PlPoss: ammitta
    ameq+Gram/GEM+N+Rel+Pl+1PlPoss: ammitta
    ameq+Gram/GEM+N+Rel+Sg+2PlPoss: ammissi
    ameq+Gram/GEM+N+Rel+Pl+2PlPoss: ammissi
    ameq+Gram/GEM+N+Rel+Sg+4PlPoss: ammimik
    ameq+Gram/GEM+N+Rel+Pl+4PlPoss: ammimik
    ameq+Gram/GEM+N+Abs+Pl+1SgPoss: ammikka
    ameq+Gram/GEM+N+Abs+Sg+2SgPoss: ammit
    ameq+Gram/GEM+N+Abs+Pl+2SgPoss: ammitit
    ameq+Gram/GEM+N+Abs+Pl+1PlPoss: ammivut
    ameq+Gram/GEM+N+Abs+Pl+2PlPoss: ammisi
    ameq+Gram/GEM+N+Abs+Pl+4PlPoss: ammitik


  Nomener som får r -> qq, miniparadigme:
    amaroq+N+Abs+Sg: amaroq
    amaroq+Gram/GEM+N+Rel+Sg: amaqqup
    amaroq+Gram/GEM+N+Abl+Sg: [amaqqumit, amaqqumiit, amaqquminngaanniit]
    amaroq+Gram/GEM+N+Aeq+Sg: amaqqutut
    amaroq+Gram/GEM+N+Ins+Sg: amaqqumik
    amaroq+Gram/GEM+N+Trm+Sg: amaqqumut
    amaroq+Gram/GEM+N+Lok+Sg: amaqqumi
    amaroq+Gram/GEM+N+Abs+Pl: amaqqut
    amaroq+Gram/GEM+N+Rel+Pl: amaqqut
    amaroq+Gram/GEM+N+Abl+Pl: [amaqqunit, amaqquniit, amaqquninngaanniit]
    amaroq+Gram/GEM+N+Aeq+Pl: amaqqutut
    amaroq+Gram/GEM+N+Ins+Pl: amaqqunik
    amaroq+Gram/GEM+N+Trm+Pl: amaqqunut
    amaroq+Gram/GEM+N+Lok+Pl: amaqquni


  Nomener som får r -> qq, possessiver:
    amaroq+N+Rel+Sg+3SgPoss: amaruata
    amaroq+N+Rel+Pl+3SgPoss: amaruisa
    amaroq+N+Abs+Sg+3PlPoss: amaruat
    amaroq+N+Rel+Sg+3PlPoss: amaruata
    amaroq+N+Rel+Pl+3PlPoss: amaruisa
    amaroq+N+Abs+Sg+3SgPoss: amarua
    amaroq+N+Abs+Pl+3SgPoss: amarui
